Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Fugitives

440.060.
Capture and return of fugitive from house of reform.

The officer of a house of reform and any peace officer or citizen may arrest, without warrant, and return to the institution, any child who escapes from a house of reform or home in which an inmate has been placed on parole.

A peace officer shall arrest any child known by him to have escaped from a house of reform, and return him to the institution.

History.

2095b-12, 2095b-15, 2095b-31.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

County children’s home, aiding escape from, KRS

201.150

.

Hindering prosecution or apprehension, KRS

520.110

to

520.130

.

Mileage and expense allowance to officer conveying child to institution, KRS

605.080

.

440.070.
Fugitive from another state; duty of Governor; determination of identity; delivery; discharge; payment of costs. [Repealed.]

440.080.
Arrest and delivery of person guilty of felony in another state. [Repealed.]

440.090.
Return to this state of fugitive from justice.

When the Governor of this state makes requisition upon the Governor of another state for a fugitive from justice, the person named in the requisition as the agent of this state shall, unless a different condition is contained in his commission, be allowed as compensation from the State Treasury for his services a mileage allowance at the same rate fixed by regulations adopted by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to KRS

44.060

, plus an additional sum calculated at the rate of five cents ($0.05) per mile for the distance he travels to and from the jail of the county designated in the proclamation to the place where the fugitive is arrested, and any other necessary expenses he pays in reclaiming and returning the fugitive. If, in attempting to reclaim the fugitive, the agent is acting within the course and scope of his employment, the amount due shall be paid over to the agent’s employer instead of the agent. When a fugitive is to be returned to this state from a location out of state which is in excess of five hundred (500) miles from the jail to which he is to be returned, commercial air transportation may be utilized in lieu of ground transportation, unless the agent undertaking the transportation decides to utilize ground transportation. Payment for air transportation shall be in lieu of the mileage payment for ground transportation only for that portion of the journey for which air transportation is used. Ground transportation and other expenses shall be paid as authorized herein. If the agent is not given possession of the fugitive for reasons beyond the agent’s control, he, or his employer, shall nevertheless be allowed the compensation prescribed by this section. Upon the return of the fugitive to the county in which the jail named in the proclamation is located, the person having him in charge shall go before a judge, who shall issue a mittimus to the jailer to receive the prisoner and keep him until he is discharged.

History.

1934: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 16, § 1; 1976, ch. 53, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 451, effective January 2, 1978; 1990, ch. 228, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 30, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

440.100.
Reward for apprehension of fugitive from justice.

In aggravated cases of murder and other felonies against the person when the accused flees from justice, the Governor, on petition of the Circuit or District Judge of the county, may issue a proclamation offering a reward of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the apprehension of the accused. This reward shall be paid upon production of a receipt from the officer named in the Governor’s proclamation, showing delivery of the fugitive to him, approved and certified by the Circuit Court of the county of that officer’s residence.

History.

344, 1932: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 452, effective January 2, 1978.

440.110.
Proclamation offering reward — Publication.

Whenever the Governor issues a proclamation offering a reward for a fugitive from justice or anyone charged with crime, he shall designate in his proclamation the jail to which the prisoner shall be delivered. It need not be the jail of the county where the offense was committed.

The Governor may order the proclamation published in a newspaper if he deems it proper under the circumstances and to the interest of the state. If he orders it published, he shall designate the paper or papers in which the publication shall be made and the number of times it shall be inserted. The account for such publication, with the approval of the Governor endorsed on it, shall be paid out of the State Treasury.

History.

1933.

440.120.
Reward is payment in full.

Anyone claiming a reward for the apprehension of a fugitive from justice shall be paid the amount of the reward as full compensation for all services and expenses in arresting and returning the fugitive.

History.

1935.

440.130.
Deputizing of agency head of another state for return of escapee or probation or parole violator.

The secretary of corrections may deputize the head of an agency of another state which is charged by that state with enforcement of penal laws to act as an agent of this state in effecting the return to this state of any person who has violated the conditions of his probation or parole or who has escaped from a penal institution of this state. In all matters relating to the return of such person to this state, such agent shall have the powers afforded a police officer of this state.

Any deputization pursuant to this section shall be in writing. Any person authorized to act as an agent of this state under the terms of this section shall carry on his person such written evidence of his authorization, and shall display the same upon demand.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 239, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 331, § 54, effective July 15, 1986.